Utah statutes.
53B-3-106.   Criminal and traffic laws in full force and effect.
(1)  All of the criminal laws of this state, including the traffic laws, are
in full force and effect on the campuses of state institutions of higher
education and upon all other property or facilities owned by the institutions
or operated or controlled by the governing board of the institution.
(2) (a)  State institutions of higher education are "political subdivisions"
and the board of the institutions is a "local authority."
(b)  All streets, roadways, alleys, and parking lots on property owned or
controlled by state institutions of higher education are "streets or highways"
as these terms are used in Title 41, Chapter 6a, Traffic Code.
